hytex/sme-hyph.dic
mplo1
mpo1b
mp2r
mpre1
mpu1m
2m1r
2ms
m1sa
ms2k
m1sko
m1sku
mso2
ms2t
msu2
2mš
mša2
mš2k
m1ške
m1šo
2m1t
1mub
1muf
1muha
1muib
1muio
1muiv
1mul
1mun
muni1
mur1
1murr
1musk
1musm
1must
2muš
1muth
1muv
2m1v
1my
my1d
2m'
na2
2nač
nade1
1nae
1nag
1nah
1nai2
1nak
1n2al
n2an
1nani
2nap
1nare
1n2as
nase1
2naš
n2at
1nati
1natu
nau1
n1avá
1navi
n2až
1naže
1naži
1n2á
ná2d
náig1
ná2ni
2n1b
nbea1
2nc
n1ca2
n1ch
ncha1
n1co
nčča2
2n1d
nda2n
nda2s
nde2l
ndi2
ndo1b
nd2ol
n2dr
nd1up
n2e
2nea
nea1g
1nec
ne2d
1nee
1ne2g
1neh
1nek
1neko
1nel
ne1la
1ne2m
1nen
ne2ni
neo1r
1ner
ner1g
1nes1
1net
2nf1
n1fe1
nfra1
2n1g
ngen1
n2goa
2n1h
1n2i
ni2d
ni1di
ni2e
nik2r
nilá1
ni2lu
ni2me
ni2mo
ni1o
nip1
nis2t
2niš
nit2t
ni2vi
1njam
1njav
1n2já2
n2jea
nje1g
1njel1
1njet
1njii
1njin
1njit
n2jo
1njod
1njoj
1njok
1njom
1njon
1njot
1njov
1nju.
1njub
1njui
1njus
1njut
2n1k
nká1
2n1l
2n1m
2n1n
nne1b
nne2g
nno2h
nnu2
1no
2n1oa
noa1g
no2la
no2le
no2lu
no2na
nopo1
nord1
no2s
n2os.
n2ost
n2ot
not2t
no2ž
2n1p
2n1r
2ns
n1sa
n1s2j
n1s2k
n1s2l
nso1b
nso2l
nso1s
n1s2p
ns2t
2n1š
nšun1
2n1t
nt2a
nta2l
nta1t
nt1h
nti1t
ntle1
nto1n
nt2r
n2trá
ntu1
1n2u
nub2
nu2g
nu2la
1nuš
nu2t
2n1v
nva1
n2ve
nven1
nvui1
1ny
2n1z
2nž
n1že
nže1j
n1ži
1ŋa
ŋa2d
ŋadu1
ŋa2l
ŋa2n
ŋa2s
ŋa2š
1ŋá
ŋá2j
ŋá2m
ŋás2t
ŋe2
ŋge2n
ŋ1go
ŋgo1b
ŋgo2n
ŋgot2
1ŋib
2ŋir
ŋis2t
2ŋ1k
ŋká2
ŋke2
ŋko2
ŋku2
ŋ1ŋ
1ŋo2
ŋo2d
ŋo2l
ŋo1u
ŋ1r
ŋu2
2oad
1oah
1oahp
1oaif
1oalg
oa1m
oame1
o2an1s
o1are
oa1sa
o1asy
o2at
1oatn
oa1vi
o1á
ob2
obbe2
o2be
obi1l
o2bu
obu1l
oc1
oc2ko
2od
o2da.
o2dal
o2das
odat1
o2de
odes1
o2din
o1dis
o2dn
o1d2o
odu1s
oe1
o1ea
o1ek
o1en
o1fe1
offi1
o1fr
o1g
ogá1
oge1
og2n
o2gŋ
o2go
og1oi
ogre1
ogu1m
ogur1
o2had
o2hag
o2han
oha1s
o2hat
ohá1m
o2he
o1ho
ohti1
o2hu
ohu1m
oi1b2m
oi1d2n
o1is2
oiva1
o1ja
o2ji
o1jis
o1jo
o1jun
o1ka
o2ke
o1kl
o1ko
okon1
o1l
olá1d
2olb
1olbm
ol2d
o2leb
o2lep
2oli
olig1
oli2m
1olm
olmo1
ol1sk
2olu
olu1m
olu2s
o1m
o2me
o2min
ommu1
om2n1
o2moš
om2pr
om1sk
o2mu
o1na
on1ar
ondo2
o1ne
o2neb
onen1
ongo1
1onia
o2nin
on1j
o2nu
o1ŋi
o1ŋu
o1o
oosk2
oot2
oote2
ope1
op1h
o1prá1
opri1
opti1
o1pu
o1ra
ora2h
ora1t
o1rá1
ordi1
o1re
ore2n
o2rie
o1ro2
oros1
orp1
orpe1
o2ru
o1ry
o1sai
osa2l
o2san
o1sas
o2se
os1h
o2si
os1j
o2sk
os1l
os1m
os2mi
os2mu
ostá1
os2tu
o2su
2o2š
oš2g
oš1ol
oš2t
o1ta
ot1h
oti1e
otná1
o2to
oto1t
ot2ro
otsa1
o1ug
1ou1t
2ove
ovga1
2ovi
o2viđ
o1vii
o1vin
ovle1
o2w1
ox1
o1y
oy2a
ozze1
o2ži
o1ä
ó1a
1p2a
pa2d
pa2go
pa2l
pal2d
pa2ma
pa2ni
pa2nu
para1
pa1re
pa2ri
pa2s
pa2še
pau1
1p2á2
2p1b
1p2e
pe2d
pe2la
pe2le
pe2m
pen1
pe2na
pe2ru
pe2s
2pg
2ph
p1ho
1p2i
pia1
pias1
pi1b
pi2d
pi2e1
pilá1
pi2le
pi2li
pin2g
pi1o
pio1n
piru1
piu1
p1j
2p2l
pla1t
ple1d
plo1d
plo1s
2p1m2
pmer1
pmi2b
pmi2r
pmo1b
pmu2
1po
2p1oa
poas1
po2ba
po2do
p2ol
po2la
polá1
polo1
po2lu
p2om
p2on
pop1
p2o2r
p2os
p2ot
p2ov
poža1
2p1p2
ppa2h
pplo1
ppo2l
ppro1
ppu1m
1p2ra
p2rá
p1rán
1prás
1p2re
pre1j
1prin
1p2ris
pro1b
pro1h
1pro1j
pro1n
pro1t
2p2s
p1sc
p1š
2p1t
p2u
1puc1
pu2go
1pun
pu2s
puš2
2pv
py1
1ra.
1rabe
2rač
1ra2d
rae1
1rag
ra2gu
1raha
1rahi
1rahu
1rai.
1raid
1raig
1rait
1raku
1ral
1rame
1rami
ra2n
1rana
1rane
1rani
1raoo
1rap
r1ar
1ras
ra1sa2
ra2se
ra2si
rask2
1rašo
1rašu
1rašv
ra2tá
1ratk
1rato1
rat2t
1ratu
1rau1
1ravi
1raža
1raže
1raži
r2á
1ráb
1ráđi
1rág
1ráj
ráje1
1rák
1rál
1rána
1ránd
rá1ne
1ráni
1rásm
1rást
1rát
1rávs
2r1b2
rba1d
rba1g
rbba2
rbea1
2rc
r1ca
r1co
2rd
r2da
r1de.
r2des
r1di2
r2div
r1d2n
r1d2o
r1du
r2e
1re.
2rea
1reá
1rebá
2rebb
re2d
1reda
ree1
re2g
1regi
1rego
1reh
1rej
1reke
1rel
relo1
re2m
1rema
1reme
1remo
1ren.
1rena
1renb
2reŋ
1reo
2rep
repo1
res1
1res.
1resc
1resh
re2si
1reš
1retk
re1v
1rež
2režž
1ré
2r1f
2rg
rga1
rga1m
rgá2
rg2ŋ
r1go
r1gr
2r1h
1ri
ri2b
ri1d
ri2dn
riea1
rien1
riga1
rii1b
riko1
ri2l
rimi1
2rin
ri2os
ri1ot
2rip1
2ris.
2r1iso
rivi1
riza1
2rj
r1ja
r1je1
r1ji
r1jo
r1ju
2rk
r1ka
rke2n
r1kl
r1ko
rku1l
2r1l
rla1m
rlla2
2r1m
rmo1
2r1n
rnos2
r2o
1ro.
2r1oa
1roc
1rod
ro1du1
1roge
ro2ha
ro2i
ro1ji
1rol
1ro2lu
1roma
1romb
1romg
1romi
1romv
1ron.
ro2na
1rone
rono1
1rop
1ropo
ro2pr
ro1sa
rosc1
ro1sk
1ro1sp
ro1še
1rot.
roto1
1rovd
1rove
ro1vi
1ro2ž
2rp
rpo1
r1p2r
r1pu2
2r1r
rra2s
rrá2
rre2
rro2
2r1s
rsá2
rsi1e
rsi1t
rs2k
rso2l
rs2p
rs2t
2rš
r1ši
r1šo
2rt
r1ta
rtná2
rttá2
rtu1
1ru
ru1is
ru2m
rum1s
ru2si
ru1ta
2r1v
rva1t
rve2s
rvo2
rvvá2
r1w
rwi1
rx1
1ryb
ry1sa
rå2s
rå2v
2r'
s2a
1sabu
1sača
1sad
sa2du
sae1
1sag
sa2ga
sa2go
sa2gu
1sa2h
1sai.
sa1is
1sait
1sak
1sal
sa2ma
1same
sa1mu
sa2ná
1sane
1sa2ni
sa2s
1sase
1sasi
1sask2
1sast
1saš
sata1
1sati
1satt
1sav
1saž
1s2á
sá2l
sá1m
sár1d
sárt1
sá2š
2s1b2
sbes1
2sc
sce1
1sco
2s1d2
sdil1
1s2e
seda1
se2di
se1je
s1ek
se2l
se1li
sem2
semb1
se2s
seso2
se1v
sex1
se2ž
1sf
2s1g
s1ha
sha1k
sha2s
s2hat
s2he
1s2i
sibi1
si2di
sid2j
si2go
2sij
si2ke
sio1
sip1
sir1
sird1
si2se
sja1
s1je
s1jo
s1ju
s2ka.
s1kan
s1kas
s1kat
ská2l
ská2n
ske2n
1s2ker
2skk
2s1kl
sko2b
1skop
1skov
s2k2r
skud1
s2kuh
1s2kun
1s2kuo
1skur
1s2kuv
s1la
s1le
s1li
s1lu
2sm
s1me
s2me.
s2med
s2mei
s2miš
sm2o
smo1s
s2n2
1so
2s1oa
soar1
s2ol
so2nj
s2o2p
so2s
sot1
s2pá
1spál
1s2pe
1spir
spi2s
sple1
splo1
2sp2o
s1p2r
spu1m
2sr
s1ra
s1rá
2s1s
ssa1g
ssá2
ssi2d
ssi2l
sso2
ssu2
2st
s1tab
sta2g
s2tan1
s1ta2r
s1taž
stá2l
s2ted
s2teh
s2tei
s2tep
s2tes
s2teš
sti2b
s2tin
s2tit
s2tiv
st2o2
s2tuh
stu1m
1s2u
sud1
sui1s
sume1
sup1
su2s
s1uvn
2s1v
svá1
svál1
1s2y
syhe1
sy2n
syp1
sy2s
s2'1
1ša
ša2b
ša2d
šadu1
ša2h
ša2la
ša1mu
ša2n
ša1s
ša2se
1šá
šá2d
šá2j
šás2m
š1b
š1č
š1d
šdil1
1šead
1šeah
1šeak
1šeav
š2ed
1šeh
1šek
1šem
1šer
šes1
šeš1
1šett
š1f
š1g
š1h
ši2d
1ši2e
1šio
ši2ra
šis2
1šiss
š1j
š1k
šken1
ški2
ško2
šk2r
šku2
š2l
šli1b
šlip1
šl2o
2š1m
šme1v
šmmo1
šo2
š1oa
1šod
šogá2
1šok
1šol
1šon
šong1
1šos
2š1r
š1s2
šsi1
2š1š
šša2
šša2s
2š1t
šta2
š2tan
štas1
štá2
šti2
što2
štu1m
1šu2
1šun
2šup
šuro2
2šuvv
2š1v
šva2
1šy
1ta.
1tab
1tabu
tac1
1ta2de
1tadi
1t2ag2
ta2gi
ta1gr
1ta2h
1tai.
1tak
t2al
1talá
1talg
1tali
1talt1
1talu
1t2am
ta2ma
ta2me
t2a2n
1tana
1tane
1tani
1tanv
1tao
ta2ra
1tare
1tari
1tasa
1ta2se
1ta2si
1task2
1tass
ta2še
1tašu
t2at
1tatg
1tati
1tato
1tatu
1tav
ta2vi
1tay
1taže
1t2á
tá2d
tá2h
tái2
tá2je
tá2ju
tá2m
tá2ni
tás2m
tá2še
tá2ši
tá2šu
2t1b
tbár1
tbea1
t1c
t2ch
t1d
tdu1
1t2e
2tea
teat1
te1b
te2d
te1f
te2gi
te1is
te2la
tel2e
te1lu
te2n
te2se
te2su
2tetn
te2ž
2težž
1té
2t1g
tge2
2th
tha2s
t1hi
1t2i
ti2b
ti2d
tien1
ti2go
ti2k
til1d
tilo1
ti2m
ti2on
ti1op
tip1
ti1r
2tiš
tivo1
t1j
2t1k
tká2
2t1l
2t1m
tmme1
2t1n2
tná2m
tne1j
tnet1
tnja2
tno1b
tnu2
1to
2t1oa
toai1
to1al
t2o2b
to2d
to2go
to2i
t2ol
to2la
to2le
to2li
to2lu
t2om
t2on
to1p
topp1
t2o2r
t2os
tos2t
tota1
to1tr
tot2t
to1ul1
t1ovc
to2vi
to2ž
t1p
tpo1
t1r
trae1
1t2rah
trai1
t2rak
2trap
2tras1
trat1
2tre
2tri
tric1
triu1
2tro
2t2ru
1trus
2t1s
tsá1
ts2k
tsmi1
ts2o
t1š
2t1t
tta2s
ttat1
ttá2r
tte2m
ttet1
tti2
ttil1
tt2o
tt2r
1t2u
tua1
tu2go
tu2la
2tull
tu2m
tu2n
tund1
2tup
tu2s
2tv
t1vi
1t2y1
ty2d
ty2n
tys2
ty2sa
1tä
1tö
1ŧa
1ŧo
ŧ1ŧ
u1a
uac1
u1á
u2ba
u2b1ár
ubb2
u1be
ub1or
u2bu
ucce1
u2da
udal1
ude1l
u1dis
u1dit
u2dn
u1do
u2du
u1e
u1f2l
u1go
1ug1r
ugu1
2u2h
uhas1
uhká2
uhu1m
ui1b2
ui1d2
uig2ŋ
uih1
uiku2
ui1le
uis2k
uiso2
uis2t
u1j
uju1
u2k
uk1l
uko1
uk1r
ukta2
u1la
ulas1
u1lá
u1le
ule2n
ule2ž
ulga1
u1li
ulo2
ulo1b
ulo1s
u2lu
ulu1m
u1lä
u2ma
1umd
u1me
u2me.
u2met
1umh
u2mi
1umlá
u1mu
umu1m
u1neš
u2ni
uni1t
un1j
un2ko
unu1
u1oa
uod1
uo2i
uoi1d
uo1j
uoja1
u2ol
uora2
uo1sa
uos1t
1up.
u2pa
1upb
1upi
upme1
uppe1
u2p1r
upra1
upre1
u1ra
u1rá
ur2du
u1re
urgo1
uri1e
u1ro
uro1b
uro2n
uro2s2
urot2
ur2t
u1ry
u1sa
usc1
usdo1
u2se
useš1
us1h
us1j
us1ko
us1l
usli1
us1mu
u2so
usse1
us2t
uste2
u1še
2ut1
uti1
utná2
u2tr
utta2
uttá2
u1u
u1vih
u1vis
u1vit
uvo2
uvva2
ux2
u1ža
u1že
u1ži
1va
va1a2
va2d
va2ga
va2h
va2m
va2n
vapo1
va2ra
va1re
var1t
va2s
va2š
vato1
1vá
vág1
vá2h
2vc
2vč
2v1d
vda2g
vda2s
vdá2
vde1
vdi2m
vd2n
vd2o
vdo1b
1ve
ve2di
ve1du
ve1ji
vero2
ves1
vevd1
v1f
2vg
vgá2
vgi2
v1g2ŋ
v1go
vgu1
1vi.
1via
1viá
1vib
1vic
1vid
vi1di
2vidj
vi2du
1viđe1
1viđi
1vie
1vig1
1vihe
1vihi
1vihk
1vihu
1vii
1vii.
vi2k
1vil
vild1
vi2me
vi2mo
1vins
1vi1o
1vip
vi1re
1vi2si
vi2sk
1vist
1vit.
1vith
1vitk
1vitm
1viv
viva1
vi2vi
v1ja
v1je
v1ji
v1jo
v1ju
v1ka
v1ko
vko2b
vko2l
2vl
v1la2
v1lá
v1le
vle1s
v1li
vlo2n
v1lu
2vn1
vnná2
vŋŋá2
1vo
vo1a
vo1č
vo2d
v1ođ
voju1
vo2le
vo2m
v1p
2vr
v1ra
vra2s
v1rá
v1re2
v1ro
v2roi
vro2l
vro2s
2vs
vs2k
v1ská
v1ske
v1sko
v1sku
vs2t
v1š
2vt
v1ta
vttá2
vtte2
1vu
vuga1
vu1m
vuro2
vu2s
2v1v
vvá2l
vvá2r
vvi2d
vvi2l
vvis2
vvo2
vzze1
2vž
v1že
v1ži
vžu1m
1vø1
1w2a
waža1
w1b
1w2e
w1k
w1l
x1a2
xami1
x1á
x1d
xde1
x1e
xemp1
x1h
xha1
x2i1
x1k
x1o
x1p2
xpe1
xpi1
x1r
x1y
y1a
1ya.
1y2ad
1yah
1y2ai
1y2am
1yana
1yask
1yaš
yat2
y1á
y1b
ybe2
y2br
yc1
yd1
y1de
ydi1
ye1
y1f
1yfe
yfes1
y1g
yge2l
ygie1
y2h
y1i2
yida2
1yii
y1k
y2k1l
y1l
ylo1
y2lut
y2me
ymo1
ympo1
y1mu
y1n
y2ne1
yn1er1
ynes1
yo1
y1oa
y1ou
y2p
ype1
yp1r
y1r
yra2h
yra2s
yrán1
ys1
ysat2
y2s2k2
yso1
yste1
y1ta
yto1
yt2t
yur1
y1v
y2vi
1yvu
yx1
y2ž
1za
za2d
za2g
za2h
za2l
za2n
za2s
zask2
zat2t
1zá2
zás2
záža1
2z1b
1ze
zeha1
ze2ž
2zg
1zi2
2zm
1zo
2z1oa
zo2h
z1oi
zo2l
zo2m
zo2n
1zu2
2zv
2z1z
ža2du1
1žaga
ža2gu
1žah
žai1
1žak
1ža2l
ža2n
ža2s
1žatg
1žatm
2žaž
1žá
žá2j
žá2ri
žás2
1že.
1žeb
1žed
1žehe
1žehi
1žes
žeš1
ž2h
1ži.
1žih
ži2k
ži2l2
žis2
1živ
ž1k
2žm
1žo2
ž1oa
ž1oi
1žu2
žuhu1
ž1v
2ž1ž
æ1f
æfe2
æ1l
æ1s
æs1t
ä1d
ä1l
ø1d
øde1
2øi
ø1k
øsao1
ö1n
å2h
å2n
å1s2
å2sa
å2si
å2sk
å1v
åvi1
'1á
'1e
'1i
'1o
